Utah statutes.
26-31-201.   Procurement and use of a blood product is a service and not a sale.

The following are considered to be the rendition of a service by each participant and are not considered to be a sale:

(1)  the procurement, processing, distribution, or use of a blood product for the purpose of injecting or transfusing the blood product into the human body; and

(2)  the process of injecting or transfusing a blood product.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 90, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

